Hawaii statutes.
[§489-23] Exclusion from civil rights
commission. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 368, this part shall
not be subject to chapter 368 and shall not be enforced by the civil rights
commission. [L 2000, c 227, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next